Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.110

Contracts for discovery and salvage of state-owned historic archaeological resources.

The director is hereby authorized to enter into contracts with other state agencies or institutions and with qualified private institutions, persons, firms, or corporations for the discovery and salvage of state-owned historic archaeological resources. Such contracts shall include but are not limited to the following terms and conditions:

(1) Historic shipwrecks:

(a) The contract shall provide for fair compensation to a salvor. "Fair compensation" means an amount not less than ninety percent of the appraised value of the objects recovered following successful completion of the contract.

(b) The salvor may retain objects with a value of up to ninety percent of the appraised value of the total objects recovered, or cash, or a combination of objects and cash. In no event may the total of objects and cash exceed ninety percent of the total appraised value of the objects recovered. A salvor shall not be entitled to further compensation from any state sources.

(c) The contract shall provide that the state will be given first choice of which objects it may wish to retain for display purposes for the people of the state from among all the objects recovered. The state may retain objects with a value of up to ten percent of the appraised value of the total objects recovered. If the state chooses not to retain recovered objects with a value of up to ten percent of the appraised value, the state shall be entitled to receive its share in cash or a combination of recovered objects and cash so long as the state's total share does not exceed ten percent of the appraised value of the objects recovered.

(d) The contract shall provide that both the state and the salvor shall have the right to select a single appraiser or joint appraisers.

(e) The contract shall also provide that title to the objects shall pass to the salvor when the permit is issued. However, should the salvor fail to fully perform under the terms of the contract, title to all objects recovered shall revert to the state.

(2) Historic aircraft:

(a) The contract shall provide that historic aircraft belonging to the state of Washington may only be recovered if the purpose of that salvage operation is to recover the aircraft for a museum, historical society, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity.

(b) Title to the aircraft may only be passed by the state to one of the entities listed in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Compensation to the salvor shall only be derived from the sale or exchange of the aircraft to one of the entities listed in (a) of this subsection or such other compensation as one of the entities listed in (a) of this subsection and the salvor may arrange. The salvor shall not have a claim to compensation from state funds.

(3) Other historic archaeological resources: The director, in his or her discretion, may negotiate the terms of such contracts.

[ 1988 c 124 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Application—1988 c 124: See notes following RCW 27.53.030.